Nevada, session 83, SB490.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $147,054
for the Ely State Prison budget account for the replacement of
maintenance, warehouse and security equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $227,313
for the Lovelock Correctional Center budget account for the
purchase of locksmith equipment and the replacement of laundry,
maintenance and warehouse equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Lovelock
Correctional Center budget account for the replacement of security
equipment the following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $2,982
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $994
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $398,347
for the Florence McClure Women’s Correctional Center budget
account for the replacement of culinary and laundry equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Florence
McClure Women’s Correctional Center budget account for the
replacement of security equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $8,971
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $994
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Florence
McClure Women’s Correctional Center budget account for small
equipment purchases the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $1,361
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $1,361
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)